North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 43. Screening of Delinquency and Undisciplined Petitions. [Repealed]

§§ 7A-530 through 7A-541.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1998-202, s. 5.

Cross References.

For screening of delinquency and undisciplined complaints under the Juvenile Code, effective July 1, 1999, see now

G.S. 7B-1700

et seq.